District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

1-508

Technical assistance.

Expired.

History

Aug. 5, 1997, 111 Stat. 786, Pub. L. 105-33, § 11722

Cross References

Merit system, effective date provisions, see § 1-636.02

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-517.

Effective Dates

Section 11721 of Title XI of Pub. L. 105-33, 111 Stat. 786, the National Capital Revitalization and Self-Government Improvement Act of 1997, provided that except as otherwise provided in this title, the provisions of this title shall take effect on the later of October 1, 1997, or the day the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority certifies that the financial plan and budget for the District government for fiscal year 1998 meet the requirements of section 201(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, as amended by this title.

Editor's Notes

Pursuant to § 11722 of Pub. L. 105-33, this section expired effective August 6, 2000.